Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1325
Transfer of sounds; sections; when not applicable.

Sections 28-1323 to 28-1326 do not apply to any person who transfers or causes to be transferred any sounds (1) intended for or in connection with radio or television broadcast transmission or related uses, (2) for archival purposes, (3) solely for the personal use of the person transferring or causing the transfer and without any compensation being derived by the person from the transfer, or (4) intended for use by an educational institution, school, or other person for instructional or educational uses.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 309.